Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.071

Priority.

If a question of existence or exercise of jurisdiction under this chapter is raised in a child custody proceeding, the question, upon proper motion, must be given priority on the calendar and handled expeditiously.

[ 2001 c 65 s 107.]